Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Veteran’s Preference

§ 25-9-301.
Definitions.

The following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context shall require otherwise:

“Veteran” means a person who served in the active Armed Forces of the United States for a period of ninety (90) days during a period of war or armed conflict and was granted an honorable discharge therefrom; or was discharged therefrom for a service-connected injury in less than ninety (90) days.

“Disabled veteran” means a veteran who the Veterans Administration has certified to have a service-connected disability rating of at least thirty percent (30%) within the last ninety (90) days, or a veteran who was awarded the Purple Heart for wounds received in combat.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 476, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991; Laws, 2019, ch. 398, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 25-9-303.
Preference for veterans in appointment, promotion and layoffs; additional preference for veterans with disabilities.

The State Personnel Board shall grant each veteran who is fully qualified preference over other applicants for an initial or promotional appointment. Disabled veterans shall be given additional preference.

In establishing a layoff formula or procedure, the State Personnel Board shall grant preference to veterans and additional preference to disabled veterans.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 346, § 2, eff from and after February 1, 1981.

§ 25-9-305.
Rules and regulations.

The State Personnel Board is authorized to establish a formula or formulas by rule and regulation to implement the provisions of sections 25-9-301 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 346, § 3, eff from and after February 1, 1981.